District of Columbia statutes.
4-561.07

The MPD’s duties.

The MPD shall provide the independent expert consultant with timely, full, and direct access to the MPD’s files and records, including:

(1)

Sexual assault investigative files, forms, and reports, including allegations, office information cases, and other cases with sexual elements that may not have been classified as a sexual assault case; and

(2)

Feedback provided to the MPD from members of the public regarding the MPD’s response to sexual assault cases, including surveys, complaints, and feedback provided through e-mail or the MPD’s web page.

History

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 207, 61 DCR 5913